North Carolina, session 2025, SB1005.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. MIDWIFERY EDUCATION GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.(a) Program; Purpose. – There is established the Midwifery Education
Grant Program (Program) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. The purpose of the Program is to
increase the number of midwives and midwife training programs in the State to support increased
prenatal, natal, and postnatal services for women and families in North Carolina.
SECTION 1.(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions
shall apply:
(1) Eligible constituent institution. – A constituent institution of The University
of North Carolina that meets both of the following criteria:
a. Has an advanced practice registered nurse (APRN) degree program.
b. Does not have an eligible midwife training program.
(2) Eligible midwife training program. – A midwife training program that
provides a certified nurse-midwife (CNM) credential.
(3) HBCU. – A constituent institution of higher education that is a historically
black college or university or a historically minority-serving institution of
higher education.
(4) Partner hospital. – A hospital located in this State that has an established
program to allow certified nurse-midwives to deliver children in the hospital.
(5) Program. – The Midwifery Education Grant Program established in this
section.
(6) System Office. – The University of North Carolina System Office.
SECTION 1.(c) Eligibility. – Any eligible constituent institution of The University
of North Carolina may apply to The University of North Carolina System Office for a grant to
establish an eligible midwife program under the Program.
SECTION 1.(d) Applications; Criteria and Guidelines. – No later than September
30, 2026, the System Office shall develop and publish criteria and guidelines for the application
process for the Program, including any documentation required to be submitted by the eligible
constituent institutions. The System Office shall accept applications until December 31, 2026.
Applications shall include, at a minimum, the following information:
*S1005-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Evidence that the applicant has or will establish a relationship with a partner
hospital.
(2) A proposed budget for the eligible midwife training program.
(3) A plan to graduate at least 20 certified nurse-midwives by the fifth year of
operation of the eligible midwife training program.
(4) A time line to establish the eligible midwife training program, including the
academic year in which the program would begin enrolling students.
SECTION 1.(e) Award and Priority. – Grant awards shall not exceed four million
dollars ($4,000,000) per eligible constituent institution, and the System Office shall award grants
to selected applicants by March 15, 2027. In awarding grants to eligible constituent institutions
under the Program, the System Office shall make every effort to ensure that grant recipients are
representative of the geographical diversity of the State and shall prioritize awards to eligible
constituent institutions that meet one or more of the following criteria, with more criteria
resulting in greater priority:
(1) Are HBCUs.
(2) Are located near a partner hospital.
(3) Have a plan to establish an eligible midwife training program as soon as
practicable and not later than the 2029-2030 academic year.
SECTION 1.(f) Use of Funds. – Grant funds awarded under the Program may be
used for any of the following purposes related to the establishment of an eligible midwife training
program:
(1) Faculty and staff.
(2) Additional nurse preceptors for the APRN degree program at the eligible
constituent institution.
(3) Other expenses necessary to establishing an eligible midwife training
program.
SECTION 1.(g) Report. – No later than October 15, 2027, and annually thereafter
until all eligible constituent institutions receiving funds have expended those funds, the System
Office shall report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal
Research Division on the following information related to the Program:
(1) Number and amount of grants awarded.
(2) Identities of eligible constituent institutions receiving grants.
(3) Identities of eligible constituent institutions that applied for grants but did not
receive one.
(4) Estimated time lines to establish eligible midwife training programs as a result
of grants received under the Program.
(5) Any other matter the System Office deems relevant.

PART II. APPROPRIATION
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the sum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to The University of North
Carolina System Office to provide grants to constituent institutions of The University of North
Carolina to establish eligible midwifery programs in accordance with Section 1 of this act. These
funds shall not revert at the end of the 2026-2027 fiscal year but shall remain available until
expended.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 1005-First Edition